Tennessee, session 114, HB1855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 28-1-113, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
Statutes of limitation in this title apply to the state and the state's political
subdivisions, unless otherwise expressly provided.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to causes of action accruing on or after that date.
HB1855
009295
- 1 -